Utah statutes.
67-1a-13.   Certification restrictions.
The lieutenant governor may not certify a signature of a notary or county
recorder on:
(1)  a document that is not properly notarized, if notarization is required;
or
(2)  a document regarding:
(a)  allegiance to a government or jurisdiction;
(b)  sovereignty;
(c)  in itinere status or world service authority; or
(d)  a claim similar to a claim listed in Subsections (2)(a) through (c).
